Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.12.050

Disbursal of state work-study funds—Criteria—Salary matching limitations.

(1) The office shall disburse state work-study funds. In performing its duties under this section, the office shall consult eligible institutions and postsecondary education advisory and governing bodies. The office shall establish criteria designed to achieve such distribution of assistance under this chapter among students attending eligible institutions as will most effectively carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(2) Funds appropriated for compensation of students placed at state work-study employers must not exceed 80 percent of the total compensation paid to students, subject to the following exceptions:

(a) Off-campus community service placements; and

(b) Placements at public and nonprofit employers that seek to increase postsecondary enrollment for high school students.

(3) The office shall define and approve, and may determine salary matching requirements for, community service placements and placements at public and nonprofit employers that seek to increase postsecondary enrollment for high school students.

[ 2024 c 182 s 3; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 144; 1994 c 130 s 5; 1987 c 330 s 201; 1985 c 370 s 59; 1974 ex.s. c 177 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Construction—Application of rules—1987 c 330: "This act shall not be construed as affecting any existing right acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended or repealed in this act or under any rule, regulation, or order adopted under those sections, nor as affecting any proceeding instituted under those sections. The rules of the agencies abolished by this act shall continue in force until acted upon by the succeeding agency and shall be enforced by the succeeding agency. If there is no succeeding agency, the rules shall terminate." [ 1987 c 330 s 1401.]

Severability—1987 c 330: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1987 c 330 s 1402.]

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 177: See note following RCW 28B.12.010.